Utah statutes.
13-49-203.   Requirement to submit to criminal background check.

(1)  The division shall require an applicant for registration as an immigration consultant to:

(a)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the division; and

(b)  consent to a fingerprint criminal background check by the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification.

(2) (a)  The division shall obtain information from a criminal history record maintained by the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification pursuant to Title 53, Chapter 10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification.

(b)  The information obtained under Subsection (2)(b) may only be used by the division to determine whether an applicant for registration as an immigration consultant meets the requirements of Subsection 13-49-202(1)(c).

